Illinois, session 104th, SB167.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The PFAS Reduction Act is amended by changing 5Section 5 and by adding Sections 45, 50, and 55 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 170/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 8otherwise provides:9    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 10Agency.11    "Class B firefighting foam" means foam designed to 12extinguish flammable liquid fires or prevent the ignition of 13flammable liquids.14    "Fire department" means the duly authorized fire 15protection organization of a unit of local government, a 16Regional Fire Protection Agency, a fire protection district, 17or a volunteer fire department.18    "Juvenile product" means a product designed or marketed 19for use by infants or children under 12 years of age. "Juvenile 20product" includes, but is not limited to, the following: a 21baby or toddler foam pillow; a bassinet; a bedside sleeper; a 22booster seat; a changing pad; a child restraint system for use 23in a motor vehicle or aircraft; a co-sleeper; a crib mattress;   SB0167- 2 -LRB104 02947 BDA 12963 b1a highchair; a highchair pad; an infant bouncer; an infant 2carrier; an infant seat; an infant sleep positioner; an infant 3swing; an infant travel bed; an infant walker; a nap cot; a 4nursing pad, pillow, or mat; a playpen; a play yard; a 5polyurethane foam mat, pad, or pillow; a portable foam nap 6mat; a portable infant sleeper; a portable hook-on chair; a 7soft-sided portable crib; a stroller; and a toddler mattress. 8"Juvenile product" does not include the following: an adult 9mattress; a children's electronic product, including a 10personal computer, audio and video equipment, a calculator, a 11wireless phone, a game console, a handheld device 12incorporating a video screen, or any associated peripheral, 13such as a mouse, a keyboard, a power supply unit, or a power 14cord; or an internal component of a product that would not come 15into direct contact with a child's skin or mouth during 16reasonably foreseeable use and abuse of the product. 17    "Local government" means a unit of local government or 18other special purpose district that provides firefighting 19services.20    "Manufacturer" means a person that creates or produces a 21product or whose brand name is affixed to the product. In the 22case of a product imported into the United States, 23"manufacturer" includes the importer or first domestic 24distributor of the product if the person that creates or 25produces the product or whose brand name is affixed to the 26product does not have a presence in the United States. a person   SB0167- 3 -LRB104 02947 BDA 12963 b1that manufactures Class B firefighting foam and any agents of 2that person, including an importer, distributor, authorized 3servicer, factory branch, or distributor branch.4    "Perfluoroalkyl substance or polyfluoroalkyl substance" or 5"PFAS" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals 6containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.7    "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, 8public or private corporation, limited liability company, or 9any other type of legal or commercial entity, including, but 10not limited to, members, managers, partners, directors, or 11officers.12    "Product" means an item manufactured, assembled, packaged, 13or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, including, but 14not limited to, its product components, sold or distributed 15for personal, residential, commercial, or industrial use, 16including for use in making other products.17    "Product component" means an identifiable component of a 18product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product 19is the manufacturer of the component.20    "Testing" means calibration testing, conformance testing, 21and fixed system testing.22(Source: P.A. 102-290, eff. 8-6-21.) 23    (415 ILCS 170/45 new)24    Sec. 45. Juvenile products; PFAS. Beginning January 1, 252026, a person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for   SB0167- 4 -LRB104 02947 BDA 12963 b1sale in this State a juvenile product if the product or a 2product component contains intentionally added PFAS. 3    (415 ILCS 170/50 new)4    Sec. 50. Enforcement regarding juvenile products.5    (a) The Agency shall investigate alleged violations of 6Section 45 and the provisions added by this amendatory Act of 7the 104th General Assembly and may refer such violations for 8prosecution by the Office of the Illinois Attorney General or 9the State's Attorney of the county in which the alleged 10violation occurred. The State's Attorney or Attorney General, 11as the case may be, may, at the request of the Agency or on its 12own volition, institute a civil action for the penalties 13described in this Act, as well as other remedies, including 14injunctive relief, as necessary to restrain or remedy 15violations of Section 45 and the provisions added by this 16amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.17    (b) The Agency may coordinate with the Department of 18Public Health in enforcing Section 45 and the provisions added 19by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.20    (c) When requested by the Agency, a person must furnish to 21the Agency any information that the person may have or may 22reasonably obtain that is relevant to show compliance with 23Section 45 and the provisions added by this amendatory Act of 24the 104th General Assembly. 25    (d) This Section shall not be construed to limit   SB0167- 5 -LRB104 02947 BDA 12963 b1enforcement of the provisions of any other Section in this 2PFAS Reduction Act.  3    (415 ILCS 170/55 new)4    Sec. 55. Exemptions regarding juvenile products. Section 545 and the provisions added by this amendatory Act of the 104th 6General Assembly do not apply to: 7        (1) a product for which federal law governs the 8    presence of PFAS in the product in a manner that preempts 9    State authority;10        (2) a product regulated under Sections 10, 15, 25, 30, 11    or 40;12        (3) the sale or resale of a used product; or13        (4) a prosthetic or orthotic device or any product 14    that is a medical device or drug or that is otherwise used 15    in a medical setting or in medical applications regulated 16    by the United States Food and Drug Administration.